apertium-oss.oss.dix
    <pardef n="ф/арс__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арс</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсы</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсӕн</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсмӕ</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсӕй</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсы</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсыл</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсау</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>арсимӕ</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрстӕ</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрсты</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрстӕн</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрстмӕ</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрстӕй</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрсты</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрстыл</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрстау</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕрстимӕ</l>
          <r>арс<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="зӕрд/ӕ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕ</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕйы</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕйӕн</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕмӕ</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕйӕ</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕйы</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕйыл</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕйау</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕимӕ</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕтӕ</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕты</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕтӕн</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕтмӕ</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕтӕй</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕты</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕтыл</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕтау</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕтимӕ</l>
          <r>ӕ<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="къудз/и__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийы</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийӕн</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийы</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийыл</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ийау</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ты</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕн</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тмӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тӕй</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ты</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тыл</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тау</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тимӕ</l>
          <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- Proper nouns -->

    <e lm="фарс"><i>ф</i><par n="ф/арс__n"/></e>
    <e lm="зӕрдӕ"><i>зӕрд</i><par n="зӕрд/ӕ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="къудзи"><i>къудз</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="кæрæдзи"><i>кæрæдз</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="топографи"><i>топограф</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="преми"><i>прем</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="орфографи"><i>орфограф</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="истори"><i>истор</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="джави"><i>джав</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="деклараци"><i>декларац</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
    <e lm="энциклопеди"><i>энциклопед</i><par n="къудз/и__n"/></e>
